Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 2. Commercial Vehicle Operators.

Legislative history reports. —

For the Governor’s transmittal letter in connection with the enactment of AS

28.33.130

,

28.33.140

, and

28.33.150

in § 19, ch. 3, SLA 1992 (HCS CSSB 261 (JUD) am H), see 1992 Senate Journal 954.

Sec. 28.33.100.
License to drive commercial motor vehicle.

A person may not drive a commercial motor vehicle until the person applies for and is issued a license for that purpose under AS

28.15.041

. The department may not issue a license to drive a commercial motor vehicle unless the applicant

is at least 18 years of age, to operate in intrastate commerce, or at least 21 years of age, to operate in interstate commerce, except as provided in (f) of this section;

has held a valid driver’s license at least one year before the date of application or meets the experience qualifications established by the department;

has successfully completed all required driving tests and written and physical examinations;

either does not have a driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction or surrenders all driver’s licenses issued by other jurisdictions; and

is domiciled in this state.

In addition to the information required under AS

28.15.111

, a commercial driver’s license shall include information determined by the United States Secretary of Transportation to be appropriate to identify the licensee.

A person who has been a state resident for 30 days or longer may not drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of a commercial driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction.

The licensing requirements of this section are in addition to the requirements imposed on a school bus driver under AS

28.15.046

.

The department shall disqualify a person for a period of 60 consecutive days, and shall reevaluate the person’s application or license to drive a commercial motor vehicle, if the department determines that the person knowingly provided false information required under

this section or AS 28.15 in an application to the department for a commercial driver’s license; or

AS

28.33.110(c)

in an application for employment.

The department may authorize a person who is at least 18 years of age but under 21 years of age to operate a commercial motor vehicle in interstate commerce if the person

holds a valid commercial driver’s license under (a) of this section; and

is authorized to operate a commercial motor vehicle in interstate commerce under federal law.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 1990; am §§ 16, 17 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 2001; am § 15 ch 23 SLA 2007; am §§
1, 2 ch 19 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For classified driver's licenses, see 2 AAC 90, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective November 14, 2019, in (a)(1), substituted “18 years of age” for “19 years of age” and inserted “, except as provided in (f) of this section”; added (f).

Sec. 28.33.110.
Notification requirements for drivers of commercial motor vehicles.

A driver of a commercial motor vehicle holding a commercial driver’s license issued by the state who is convicted of violating a federal or state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in this or another state, or a federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal law relating to motor vehicle traffic control in Canada, other than parking violations, shall notify the driver’s employer, in writing, of the conviction within 30 days after the date of conviction.

A driver whose operating privilege is suspended, revoked, or canceled by a state, who loses the privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in a state for any period, or who is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for any period, shall notify the driver’s employer of that fact before the end of the business day following the day the driver received notice of the suspension, revocation, cancellation, loss, or disqualification.

A person who applies for employment as a commercial motor vehicle driver shall

provide the person’s prospective employer, at the time of application for employment, with the following information for the 10 years preceding the date of application:

a list of the names and addresses of employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle;

the dates between which the applicant drove for each employer;

the reason for leaving each employer;

certify that the information provided under this subsection is true and complete; and

provide additional information required by the employer.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 1990)

Sec. 28.33.120.
Responsibilities of employers of commercial motor vehicle driver.

An employer of a commercial motor vehicle driver

shall require an applicant for employment to provide the information required under AS

28.33.110(c)

;

may not knowingly allow, require, permit, assign, or authorize a driver to drive a commercial motor vehicle during a period in which

the driver’s license is suspended, revoked, or canceled by a state;

the driver has lost the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in a state;

the driver has been disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle;

the driver has more than one driver’s license;

the driver is not licensed to drive a commercial motor vehicle; or

may not knowingly allow, require, permit, assign, or authorize the driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal or state statute or regulation, or a local law or ordinance, relating to railroad-highway grade crossings.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 1990; am § 18 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 2003)

Sec. 28.33.130.
Out-of-service orders.

A person may not operate a commercial motor vehicle or be on duty

if, within the preceding four hours, the person

consumed or was under the influence of

an alcoholic beverage;

a controlled substance not prescribed by a physician; or

a controlled substance prescribed by a physician that might impair a person’s ability to operate a commercial motor vehicle; or

had any measurable alcohol concentration within the blood or breath or any detectable presence of alcohol;

while in possession of an alcoholic beverage or a controlled substance not prescribed by a physician unless

the alcoholic beverage or controlled substance is manifested and documented as part of an authorized shipment of cargo; or

under AS 04, the alcoholic beverage may be legally served to passengers being carried for hire;

after being placed out of service for violation of a regulation adopted under AS

19.10.060(c)

or AS

28.05.011

; or

with an invalid operator’s or commercial operator’s license.

An employer, or a peace officer, who has reasonable grounds to believe that a person has violated (a) of this section, shall immediately give the person a written notice ordering the person out of service. If it is not possible to issue a written out of service order, a verbal order may be issued. An employer may not knowingly allow, require, permit, assign, or authorize a person to operate a commercial motor vehicle or be on duty during a period in which

the person has been ordered out of service under this section; or

the person has violated (a) of this section, even if an out-of-service order has not been issued.

A person who is ordered out of service

may not operate a commercial motor vehicle or be on duty for 24 hours following issuance of the out-of-service order; and

shall report that fact, in writing,

within 24 hours to the person’s employer; and

within 30 days to the department if the person possesses a commercial motor vehicle license.

In this section, “on duty” means the period of time in which a person is

required by the person’s employer to be ready to immediately operate a commercial motor vehicle, including time spent waiting to be assigned to operate a commercial motor vehicle;

inspecting, servicing, or conditioning a commercial motor vehicle;

in or upon a commercial motor vehicle, except time spent resting in a sleeper berth;

loading or unloading, or supervising the loading or unloading of, a commercial motor vehicle, or giving or receiving receipts for shipments loaded or unloaded;

taking action, as required by state or federal law, following an accident involving a commercial motor vehicle; or

repairing or obtaining assistance for a disabled commercial motor vehicle.

History.

(§ 19 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 21 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am E.O. No. 99 § 54 (1997); am § 2 ch 80 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For school bus driver permit, see 2 AAC 90, art. 2.

Sec. 28.33.140.
Conviction resulting in disqualification from driving commercial vehicle.

In addition to any court action or administrative action in this or any other jurisdiction, conviction of a person who holds or is required to have a commercial driver’s license or commercial instruction permit of any of the following offenses is grounds for immediate disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle for the periods set out in this section:

operating a commercial motor vehicle while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance in violation of AS

28.33.030

;

refusal to submit to a chemical test in violation of AS

28.35.032

;

operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance in violation of AS

28.35.030

;

leaving the scene of an accident in violation of AS

28.35.060

, or failing to file, or providing false information in, an accident report in violation of AS

28.35.110

;

a felony under state or federal law that was facilitated because the person used a motor vehicle;

a serious traffic violation;

taking one of the following actions in violation of regulations adopted under AS

19.10.060(c)

or AS

28.05.011

:

driving after being placed out of service; or

operating a commercial vehicle that has been placed out of service;

operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal or state statute or regulation, or a local law or ordinance, relating to railroad-highway grade crossings;

operating a commercial motor vehicle while the driver’s commercial motor vehicle license is suspended, revoked, or canceled, or the driver is disqualified;

causing a fatality through the negligent operation, or operation in violation of a felony criminal law, of a commercial motor vehicle.

[Repealed, § 31 ch 23 SLA 2007.]

Upon a conviction by a court of a person of an offense described in (a)(6) of this section, the department shall disqualify that person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for not less than 60 days if the person has been previously convicted once, and 120 days if the person has been previously convicted more than once. The disqualification period under this subsection is in addition to any other previously imposed period of disqualification. As used in this subsection, “previously convicted” means having been convicted in this or another jurisdiction, within three years preceding the date of the present offense, of an offense described in (a)(6) of this section, or of another law or ordinance with substantially similar elements, arising out of a separate incident.

Upon conviction by a court of a person of an offense described in (a)(1) — (5), (9), or (10) of this section, the department shall disqualify that person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for not less than one year for a first offense, except that, if the offense was

facilitated by a commercial motor vehicle transporting a hazardous material that required that placards be placed on the vehicle under 49 U.S.C. 5101 — 5127, the period of disqualification is not less than three years;

a felony offense that involved the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense, a controlled substance, the disqualification is for life and the license may not be reinstated under (g) of this section.

Upon conviction by a court of a person of an offense described in (a)(1) — (5), (9), or (10) of this section, the department shall disqualify that person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for life if the person has been previously convicted. As used in this subsection, “previously convicted” means having been convicted in this or another jurisdiction of an offense described in (a)(1) — (5), (9), or (10) of this section, or of another law or ordinance with substantially similar elements.

A person who is disqualified under this section may not obtain a limited license under AS

28.15.201

to permit driving a commercial motor vehicle.

A person disqualified for life under (e) of this section may apply to the department for reinstatement of a commercial driver’s license if

the person has successfully completed an appropriate rehabilitation program satisfactory to the department;

the person has not committed a felony offense, or a misdemeanor offense involving operation of a motor vehicle, during the period of disqualification; and

the person has undergone a minimum disqualification period of 10 years.

A disqualified driver reinstated under (g) of this section who is subsequently convicted of a disqualifying offense described in (a)(1) — (5) of this section is permanently disqualified for life and is ineligible to again apply for reinstatement under (g) of this section.

In addition to the requirements of AS

28.15.191

, a court that disqualifies a person from driving a commercial motor vehicle shall require the surrender of the license, and shall immediately forward the license to the department with the record of conviction and notification of the effective date of the disqualification. If the disqualification occurs by administrative action as described in (a) of this section, the person disqualified from driving shall surrender the license to the department.

Upon conviction by a court of a person of an offense described in (a)(7) of this section, the department shall disqualify that person from driving a commercial motor vehicle for the following periods: (1) if the person has not been previously convicted of violating an out-of-service order, not less than 180 days; (2) if the person has been previously convicted once of violating an out-of-service order, not less than two years; (3) if the person has been previously convicted more than once of violating an out-of-service order, not less than three years; (4) if the person operates a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials or a vehicle designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver, in violation of an out-of-service order, not less than 180 days; (5) if the person has been previously convicted of operating a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials or a vehicle designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver, in violation of an out-of-service order two or more times in separate incidents within a 10-year period, not less than three years. In this subsection, “previously convicted” means having been convicted in this or another jurisdiction of an offense described in (a)(7) of this section within 10 years preceding the date of the present offense.

Upon conviction by a court of a person of an offense described in (a)(8) of this section, the department shall disqualify that person from operating a commercial motor vehicle for the following periods: (1) if the person has not been previously convicted of violating a federal or state statute or regulation, or a local law or ordinance, relating to railroad-highway grade crossings, not less than 60 days; (2) if the person has been previously convicted once of violating a federal or state statute or regulation, or a local law or ordinance, relating to railroad-highway grade crossings, not less than 120 days; (3) if the person has been previously convicted more than once of a violation of a federal or state statute or regulation, or a local law or ordinance, relating to railroad-highway grade crossings, not less than one year. In this subsection, “previously convicted” means having been convicted in this or another jurisdiction of an offense described in (a)(8) of this section within three years proceeding the date of the present offense.

A person who operates a commercial motor vehicle whose driving is determined by the United States Department of Transportation to constitute an imminent hazard is subject to disqualification as specified by the department in regulation. The regulations adopted by the department under this subsection must be substantially similar to those set by the federal government.

A person who violates the standards for operating a commercial motor vehicle or who knowingly operates a commercial motor vehicle that has been placed out of service as set out by the department in regulation is subject to civil penalties established by the department in regulation. An employer who knowingly allows an employee to drive in violation of an out-of-service order or in violation of a railroad-highway grade crossing is subject to civil penalties as described in 49 U.S.C. 521(b) as established by the department in regulation. The department may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 to implement this subsection. The regulations adopted under this subsection must be substantially similar to any applicable federal regulations. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 3 SLA 1992; am §§ 22, 23 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am § 16 ch 33 SLA 1999; am § 26 ch 60 SLA 2002; am §§ 2, 3 ch 36 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 80 SLA 2003; am §§ 16 — 23, 31 ch 23 SLA 2007; am §§ 11, 12 ch 80 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For school bus driver permit, see 2 AAC 90, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 11, 2014, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “or commercial instruction permit” following “have a commercial driver’s license”, in the introductory language in (a)(7), substituted “taking one of the following actions” for “driving after being placed out of service” and added (a)(7)(A) and (a)(7)(B); in (m), inserted “or who knowingly operates a commercial motor vehicle that has been placed out of service as” following “operating a commercial vehicle” in the first sentence; made related and stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30, ch. 3, SLA 1992 provides that for the purposes of this section, enacted by § 19, ch. 3, SLA 1992, convictions for offenses committed before April 1, 1992 are considered previous convictions.

Sec. 28.33.150.
Driving a commercial motor vehicle without being lawfully licensed.

A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the person drives a commercial motor vehicle in this state

without being licensed or privileged in this state to drive a commercial motor vehicle;

during a period when that person’s driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license has been canceled, suspended, or revoked, or the person has been disqualified, in this or another jurisdiction;

in violation of a limitation placed upon that person’s license or privilege to drive in this or another jurisdiction;

during a period when that person has been disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle by a court or an administrative agency in this or another jurisdiction; or

in violation of an out-of-service order issued under AS

28.33.130

or under a law in another jurisdiction having substantially similar requirements.

Upon conviction under (a)(2) — (5) of this section, the court

shall impose a minimum sentence of imprisonment

if the person has not been previously convicted, of not less than 20 days with 10 days suspended, including a mandatory condition of probation that the defendant complete not less than 80 hours of community work service; or

if the person has been previously convicted, of not less than 60 days and a fine of $1,000;

may impose additional conditions of probation;

may not

suspend execution of sentence or grant probation except on condition that the person serve a minimum term of imprisonment and perform required community work service as provided in (1) of this subsection;

suspend imposition of sentence; and

shall revoke the person’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license, and the person may not be issued a new license nor may the privilege to drive or obtain a license be restored for an additional period of not less than 90 days after the date that the person would have been entitled to restoration of driving privileges.

In this section, “previously convicted” means having been convicted in this or another jurisdiction, within 10 years preceding the date of the present offense, of a violation of this section, AS

28.15.291

, or another law or ordinance with substantially similar elements.

History.

(§ 19 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 24 ch 23 SLA 2007)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30, ch. 3, SLA 1992 provides that for the purposes of this section, enacted by § 19, ch. 3, SLA 1992, convictions for offenses committed before April 1, 1992 are considered previous convictions.